Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.040

Duty to audit claims against county.

The county auditor shall audit all claims, demands, and accounts against the county which by law are chargeable to the county, except such cost or fee bills as are by law to be examined or approved by some other judicial tribunal or officer. Such claims as it is his or her duty to audit shall be presented to the board of county commissioners for their examination and allowance.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4024; 1963 c 4 s 36.22.040. Prior: 1893 c 119 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 2710, part; 1869 p 310 s 5, part; 1863 p 549 s 5, part; 1854 p 425 s 5, part; RRS s 4086, part.]